South Dakota, session 2026, SB185.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 61-5-29.1 be AMENDED:
61-5-29.1. There is hereby created in the state treasury a special revenue fund
to be known as the employer's investment in South Dakota's future fund. Moneys in the
fund must be used for purposes related to, to be administered by the Governor's Office of
Economic Development, for the purpose of making awards for research and or economic
development for the projects in this state.
The employer's investment in South Dakota's future fund is continuously
appropriated to the Governor's Office of Economic Development.
For purposes of this section, § 61-5-29.3, and sections 3 to 6, inclusive, of this Act,
"a research or economic development project" means:
(1) Research or equipment required as part of key industries or industries determined
to be viable through an economic base analysis for the state of South Dakota or a
specific community;
(2) Scholarships to postsecondary educational institutions operated by the Board of
Regents or the South Dakota Board of Technical Education, provided that the
scholarships are for programs that prepare a student for a career field available in
this state;
(3) Workforce development, apprentice programs, workforce trainings, workforce
recruitment, or career and technical education programs offered through a school
district, accredited nonpublic school, or institution operated by the Board of
Regents or the South Dakota Board of Technical Education;
(4) The development of infrastructure required to support economic development in
this state;
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.935.10 2 185
(5) Projects that support business retention or expansion;
(6) Recruiting out-of-state workers to move to and work in a career field available in
this state; and
(7) Supporting other organizations or entities that support economic development
projects that may receive moneys from the fund.
Section 2. That § 61-5-29.3 be AMENDED:
61-5-29.3. The Governor's Office of Economic Development shall report to either
the Joint Committee on Appropriations or the Interim Committee on Appropriations and
the Government Operations and Audit Committee on a biannual basis the following for
each award or grant made from the fund:
(1) The name of the recipient and the amount of the award or grant;
(2) The location of the recipient;
(3) The research or economic development purpose being funded;
(4) The measures being used to determine the economic impact of the award or grant;
and
(5) The number of jobs created or retained, if any.
Section 3. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 61-5:
If an applicant for an award from the employer's investment in South Dakota's
future fund is a business, the applicant must submit a business plan to the Governor's
Office of Economic Development before the Governor may award the applicant any
moneys from the fund. The applicant's business plan must include:
(1) The goods or services to be offered by the applicant;
(2) A description of the types of jobs required to offer the goods or services provided,
the educational requirement for each type of job, and the compensation package
to be offered to individuals employed to perform each type of job;
(3) The accounting practices employed by the business; and
(4) Other private or public funding received by the applicant.
Section 4. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 61-5:
Moneys from the employer's investment in South Dakota's future fund may be
awarded only to reimburse the actual cost of the research or economic development
project.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.935.10 3 185
Before any moneys may be expended from the fund, the applicant shall:
(1) Sign an agreement with the Governor's Office of Economic Development;
(2) Provide an itemized invoice of all expenditures made by the applicant required in
furtherance of the project and documentation demonstrating proof of payment;
and
(3) Provide documentation demonstrating that the applicant has received a matching
commitment or an in-kind consideration for a benefitted city, county, local
industrial development corporation, as defined in § 9-27-37, chamber of
commerce, nonprofit corporation, or other development organization or capital
investment.
Any agreement executed pursuant to subdivision (1) of this section is open to
public inspection and must be posted on the state's website.
Section 5. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 61-5:
Before the Governor may approve the award of moneys from the employer's
investment in South Dakota's future fund, the Governor's Office of Economic Development
shall provide a detailed recommendation for the award to the Governor. Upon receiving
approval for the award from the Governor, the commissioner of the Governor's Office of
Economic Development and the applicant must sign the agreement required, pursuant to
section 4 of this Act.
Each recommendation for an award provided pursuant to this section is open to
public inspection and must be posted on the state's website. Any information in the
recommendation that constitutes trade secrets or other sensitive or privileged information
is not open to public inspection.
Section 6. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 61-5:
The Governor's Office of Economic Development shall promulgate rules, pursuant
to chapter 1-26, establishing:
(1) The process by which an individual or entity applies for an award from the
employer's investment in South Dakota's future fund;
(2) The methods for assessing or estimating the economic impact, including the
potential investment-to-impact ratio, that a research project or economic
development opportunity will have on the state;
(3) The contractual provisions that must be included in the agreement signed by the
applicant and the Governor's Office of Economic Development, including:
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.935.10 4 185
(a) Performance expectations;
(b) A schedule for providing performance progress reports to the Governor's
Office of Economic Development;
(c) A conflict-of-interest policy; and
(d) Other contractual provisions that provide for the general terms and
conditions of the agreement;
(4) The criteria for determining how a research project or economic development
opportunity is recommended to the Governor for an award from the fund;
(5) Any requirements that the individual or entity applying for an award must meet in
order to receive the award;
(6) The documentation required to demonstrate:
(a) Proof of payment for all expenditures for which the applicant seeks
reimbursement; and
(b) That the applicant has received a matching commitment or an in-kind
consideration, pursuant to section 4 of this Act;
(7) The process by which an award is disbursed; and
(8) The process by which any moneys awarded from the fund are returned to the fund
in the event of a change in the project's circumstances, the applicant's failure to
meet the established performance expectations, or the project's failure or
relocation outside of the state.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.